Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Kentucky Model Procurement Code
45A.345.
Definitions for KRS 45A.343 to 45A.460.

As used in KRS

45A.343

to

45A.460

, unless the context indicates otherwise:

“Aggregate amount” means the total dollar amount during a fiscal year of items of a like nature, function, and use the need for which can reasonably be determined at the beginning of the fiscal year. Items the need for which could not reasonably be established in advance or which were unavailable because of a failure of delivery need not be included in the aggregate amount.

“Capital cost avoidance” means moneys expended by a local public agency to pay for an energy conservation measure identified as a permanent equipment replacement and whose cost has been discounted by any additional energy and operation savings generated from other energy conservation measures identified in the guaranteed energy savings contract, except that for school districts capital cost avoidance shall also mean moneys expended by the district from one (1) or more of the following sources:

General fund;

Capital outlay allotment under KRS

157.420

; and

State and local funds from the Facilities Support Program of Kentucky under KRS

157.440

.

“Chief executive officer” means the mayor, county judge/executive, superintendent of schools, or the principal administrative officer of a local public agency, or the person designated by the chief executive officer or legislative body of the local public agency to perform the procurement function.

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, repairing, or improving any public structure or building, or other public improvements of any kind to any public real property. It does not include the routine operation, routine repair, or routine maintenance of existing structures, buildings, or real property.

“Contract” means all types of local public agency agreements, including grants and orders, for the purchase or disposal of supplies, services, construction, or any other item. It includes awards and notices of award; contracts of a fixed-price, cost, cost-plus-a-fixed-fee, or incentive type; contracts providing for the issuance of job or task orders; leases; letter contracts; and purchase orders. It also includes supplemental agreements with respect to any of the foregoing. It does not include labor contracts with employees of local public agencies.

“Document” means any physical embodiment of information or ideas, regardless of form or characteristic, including electronic versions thereof.

“Established catalogue price” means the price included in the most current catalogue, price list, schedule, or other form that:

Is regularly maintained by the manufacturer or vendor of an item; and

Is either published or otherwise available for inspection by customers; and

States prices at which sales are currently or were last made to a significant number of buyers constituting the general buying public for that item.

“Evaluated bid price” means the dollar amount of a bid after bid price adjustments are made pursuant to objective measurable criteria, set forth in the invitation for bids, which affect the economy and effectiveness in the operation or use of the product, such as reliability, maintainability, useful life, residual value, and time of delivery, performance, or completion.

“Invitation for bids” means all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting bids in accordance with the procedures set forth in KRS

45A.365

.

“The legislative body or governing board” means a council, commission, or other legislative body of a city, consolidated local government, or urban-county; a county fiscal court; board of education of a county or independent school district; board of directors of an area development district or special district; or board of any other local public agency.

“Local public agency” means a city, county, urban-county, consolidated local government, school district, special district, or an agency formed by a combination of such agencies under KRS Chapter 79, or any department, board, commission, authority, office, or other sub-unit of a political subdivision which shall include the offices of the county clerk, county sheriff, county attorney, coroner, and jailer.

“May” means permissive. However, the words “no person may . . ..” mean that no person is required, authorized, or permitted to do the act prescribed.

“Negotiation” means contracting by either the method set forth in KRS

45A.370

,

45A.375

, or

45A.380

.

“Noncompetitive negotiation” means informal negotiation with one (1) or more vendor, contractor, or individual without advertisement or notice.

“Objective measurable criteria” means sufficient information in the invitation to bid as to weight and method of evaluation so that the evaluation may be determined with reasonable mathematical certainty. Criteria which are otherwise subjective, such as taste and appearance, may be established when appropriate.

“Person” means any business, individual, union, committee, club, or other organization or group of individuals.

“Procurement” means the purchasing, buying, renting, leasing, or otherwise obtaining any supplies, services, or construction. It also includes all functions that pertain to the obtaining of any public procurement, including description of requirements, selection, and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of contract, and all phases of contract administration.

“Request for proposals” means all documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, utilized for soliciting proposals in accordance with the procedures set forth in KRS

45A.370

,

45A.375

,

45A.380

, or

45A.385

.

“Responsible bidder or offeror” means a person who has the capability in all respects to perform fully the contract requirements, and the integrity and reliability which will assure good faith performance.

“Responsive bidder” means a person who has submitted a bid under KRS

45A.365

which conforms in all material respects to the invitation for bids, so that all bidders may stand on equal footing with respect to the method and timeliness of submission and as to the substance of any resulting contract.

“Reverse auction” means a real-time, structured bidding process, usually lasting less than one (1) hour, and taking place during a previously scheduled time and Internet location, during which multiple bidders, anonymous to each other, submit revised, lower bids to provide the solicited good or leased space.

“Services” means the rendering, by a contractor, of its time and effort rather than the furnishing of a specific end product other than reports which are merely incidental to the required performance of service. It does not include labor contracts with employees of local public agencies.

“Shall” means imperative.

“Specifications” means any description of a physical or functional characteristic of a supply, service, or construction item. It may include a description of any requirement for inspecting, testing, or preparing a supply, service, or construction item for delivery.

“Supplemental agreement” means any contract modification which is accomplished by the mutual action of the parties.

“Supplies” means all property, including but not limited to leases on real property, printing, and insurance, except land or a permanent interest in land.

“Energy conservation measure” means a training program or facility alteration designed to reduce energy consumption or operating costs, and may include one (1) or more of the following:

Insulation of the building structure or systems within the building;

Storm windows or doors, caulking or weatherstripping, multiglazed windows or doors, heat absorbing or heat reflective glazed and coated window or door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area, or other window and door system modifications that reduce energy consumption;

Automated or computerized energy control systems;

Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning system modifications or replacements;

Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase the energy efficiency of the lighting system without increasing the overall illumination of a facility, unless an increase in illumination is necessary to conform to the applicable state or local building code for the lighting system after the proposed modifications are made;

Energy recovery systems;

Cogeneration systems that produce steam or forms of energy such as heat, as well as electricity, for use primarily within a building or complex of buildings;

Energy, water, or wastewater conservation measures that provide long-term operating cost reductions or billable revenue increases;

Any life safety measures that provide long-term operating cost reductions;

Water and wastewater conservation measures, including plumbing fixtures and infrastructure;

Equipment upgrades that improve the accuracy of billable revenue generating systems; or

Automated, electronic, or remotely controlled systems or measures that reduce direct personnel costs.

“Guaranteed energy savings contract” means a contract for the evaluation and recommendation of energy, water, and wastewater conservation measures and for implementation of one (1) or more of those measures. The contract shall provide that all payments, except obligations on termination of the contract before its expiration, are to be made over time and the savings are guaranteed to the extent necessary to make payments for the cost of the design, installation, and maintenance of energy, water, and wastewater conservation measures.

“Qualified provider” means a person or business experienced in the design, implementation, and installation of energy, water, and wastewater conservation measures and is determined to be qualified by the local public agency. The qualified provider shall be responsible for and shall provide the local public agency with the following information regarding guaranteed energy, water, and wastewater savings contracts:

Project design and specifications;

Construction management;

Construction;

Commissioning;

On-going services as required;

Measurement and verification of savings for guaranteed energy, water, and wastewater savings contracts; and

Annual reconciliation statements as provided in KRS 45A.352(8).

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 70, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 8, effective April 9, 1980; 1994, ch. 491, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 120, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 375, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 12, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 163, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 63, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

45A.350.
Application. [Repealed.]

45A.351.
Declaration of public policy on preservation of Commonwealth’s natural resources through energy efficiency.

Recognizing the need in the Commonwealth to preserve to the greatest extent possible natural resources within the Commonwealth which produce energy for the citizens, businesses, schools, and governments within the Commonwealth, it shall be the policy of the Commonwealth to preserve these natural resources by maximizing the use of energy efficiency measures in the construction, renovation, and maintenance of buildings owned by local public agencies and to encourage local public agencies to incorporate cost-effective energy efficiency measures into their buildings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 203, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

45A.352.
Guaranteed energy savings contracts involving local public agencies.

A local public agency may enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract for innovative solutions for energy conservation measures. The local public agency shall submit a request for proposals. The request for proposals for competitive procurement of guaranteed energy savings contracts shall include the following:

The name and address of the governmental unit;

The name, address, title, and phone number of a contact person;

Notice indicating that the local public agency is requesting qualified providers to propose energy conservation measures through a guaranteed energy savings contract;

The following evaluation criteria for assessing the proposals:

Construction management capabilities;

Technical approach to facilities included;

Financial attributes, as defined by total cost of contract and guaranteed savings and provider’s financial strength demonstrating ability to fulfill the guarantee term; and

Provider’s capability, personnel, track record, and demonstrated ability to accomplish the contract;

The date, time, and place where proposals must be received;

Any other stipulations and clarifications the local public agency may require; and

An overview prepared by the local public agency stating goals or objectives specific to facility needs to be considered by the qualified providers who are responding to the request. Detailed scope of construction is not required.

Respondents to the request for proposal shall provide the following:

A detailed list of the proposed energy conservation measures and the guaranteed savings which shall be supported with calculations. Any guaranteed energy and operational savings shall be determined by using one of the measurement and verification methodologies listed in the United States Department of Energy’s “Measurement and Verification Guideline for Federal Energy Projects” or in the “North American Energy Measurement and Verification Protocol.” If due to existing data limitations or the nonconformance of specific project characteristics, none of the methods listed in either the United States Department of Energy’s “Measurement and Verification Guideline for Federal Energy Projects” or in the “North American Energy Measurement and Verification Protocol” is sufficient for measuring guaranteed savings, the qualified provider shall develop an alternate method that is compatible with one (1) of the two (2);

The estimated cost of the proposed energy conservation measures including engineering, construction, commissioning, measurement and verification, annual reconciliation statements, and required on-going services; and

Proposed method and costs of financing.

The value for total cost of the contract minus the calculated savings from the energy conservation measures listed in the qualified provider’s proposal, shall be within fifteen percent (15%) of the value for the total cost of the contract minus the calculated savings after the final contract has been negotiated. If the difference between the proposed and the final contract is not within fifteen percent (15%) and the local public agency and the qualified provider are unable to renegotiate the final contract to reconcile the difference between the proposed and final contract values, then the local public agency may:

Stop negotiations with the current qualified provider; and

Select an alternate provider.

The local public agency may, as a component of the request for proposal, solicit and negotiate additional maintenance services for the affected proposed energy conservation measures. Additional services shall be subject to budget appropriations on an annual basis and may be discontinued at any time over the guarantee period with no negative impact to the guaranteed savings contract.

The local public agency shall utilize the request for proposal process to enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract. The local public agency may, at its discretion, utilize a request for qualifications, provided that the local public agency solicits qualification statements from multiple potentially qualified providers. The local public agency shall use the qualification statements to select no fewer than two (2) providers and each provider shall then be subject to the request-for-proposal requirement provided in subsections (1) to (4) of this section.

The local public agency shall select the provider best qualified to meet its needs. The local public agency shall provide public notice of the meeting at which it proposes to award a guaranteed energy savings contract, the name of the parties to the proposed contract, and the purpose of the contract. The public notice shall be made at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting. After reviewing the proposals, a local public agency may enter into a guaranteed energy savings contract with a qualified provider if it finds that the amount it would spend on the energy conservation measures recommended in the proposal would not exceed the amount to be saved in either energy or operational costs plus capital cost avoidance within the term of the contract from the date of installation, if the recommendations in the proposal are followed.

The guaranteed energy savings contract shall include a written guarantee of the qualified provider that either the energy or operational costs savings plus capital cost avoidance will meet or exceed the costs of the energy conservation measures within the term of the contract. The qualified provider shall, on an annual basis, reimburse the local public agency for any shortfall in guaranteed energy savings projected in the contract. A qualified provider shall provide a sufficient bond to the local public agency for the installation and the faithful performance of all the measures included in the contract. The guaranteed energy savings contract may provide for payments over a period of time, not to exceed the term of the contract.

The qualified provider shall provide the local public agency with an annual reconciliation statement. The statement shall disclose any shortfalls or surplus between guaranteed energy and operational savings specified in the guaranteed energy savings contract and actual energy and operational savings incurred during a given guarantee year. The guarantee year shall consist of a twelve (12) month term commencing from the time that the energy conservation measures became fully operational. The qualified provider shall pay the local public agency any short fall in the guaranteed energy and operation savings within thirty (30) days after the total year savings have been determined. If there is a surplus in the actual guaranteed energy and operational savings in a given year, that surplus savings may be carried forward and applied against any possible savings shortfall in the following guarantee year, except that the surplus carried forward is limited to a period not to exceed one (1) year. If the qualified provider pays the local public agency for a short fall in energy or operational savings incurred during a given guarantee year and there is a surplus in energy or operational savings in future guarantee years, the qualified provider shall bill the local public agency for an amount not to exceed the amount of the short fall in the given guarantee year.

The use of capital cost avoidance shall be subject to the following restrictions:

The amount expended shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the project cost; and

Capital cost avoidance shall be restricted to payment for permanent equipment replacement as follows:

Storm windows or doors, multiglazed windows or doors, additional glazing, and reduction in glass area;

Replacement of heating, ventilating, or air conditioning major components or systems;

New lighting fixtures where required to achieve Illuminating Engineering Society of North America (IES) standards, provided the existing light fixtures shall have been determined to be obsolete and incapable of achieving IES standards; and

Life safety system replacements or upgrades which shall have been determined to be necessary to conform with existing state and local codes and standards.

The commissioner of education shall review, and approve or disapprove projects from local school districts relating to energy conservation measures under a guaranteed energy savings contract, on the basis of the following guidelines:

The project design’s compliance with technical, health, and safety standards as required by administrative regulation;

The availability of general funds, capital outlay allotments under KRS

157.420

or local and state funds from the Facilities Support Program of Kentucky as provided by KRS

157.440

, for projects that will use capital cost avoidance;

The appropriate use of capital outlay allotments under KRS

157.420

, local and state funds from the Facilities Support Program of Kentucky as provided by KRS

157.440

, for projects using capital cost avoidance, based on the project’s compliance with the district’s approved facility plan;

The funding capability of the school district; and

The financing mechanism and proper financing documentation.

The request for proposal as provided in subsections (1) to (4) of this section shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements set out in KRS

162.070

, and shall not be subject to an award determination based on the lowest competitive bid or a separate bidding process for each energy conservation measure listed in the proposal.

A guaranteed energy savings contract that does not involve construction or the installation of physical improvements shall not require the approval of the commissioner of education and shall not be subject to other requirements of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 203, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 375, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 122, § 3, effective June 26, 2007.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). A manifest clerical or typographical error in this section has been corrected by the Reviser of Statutes under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

45A.353.
Extension of guaranteed energy savings contract — Documentation of savings — Lease-purchase agreements — Exemption from debt limitations.

Guaranteed energy savings contracts may extend beyond the fiscal year in which they become effective. The local public agency shall include in its annual budget and appropriations act, for each subsequent fiscal year, any accounts payable under guaranteed energy savings contracts during the fiscal year.

The local public agency shall document the operational and energy cost savings and capital cost avoidance specified in the guaranteed energy savings contract and designate and appropriate that amount for an annual payment of the contract. If the annual energy and operational savings are less than projected under the guaranteed savings contract, the qualified provider shall pay the difference as provided for in KRS

45A.352

.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, a local public agency may finance the installation of energy conservation measures for its buildings through a lease-purchase agreement, bonds, or whichever brings the most economic value to the local public agency, subject to the local public agency’s compliance with all other laws regarding approval of plans for additions, alterations, or renovations of its buildings.

The component which is guaranteed as energy savings and as operational savings shall be exempt from current or future debt limitations, except that capital cost avoidance, as defined in KRS

45A.345

, shall be limited to current or future debt limitations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 203, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 375, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

45A.355.
Determinations — Finality.

Every determination required by this code shall be in writing and based upon written findings of the public official making the determination. These determinations and written findings shall be retained in the official contract file.

The determinations required by KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

shall be final and conclusive unless they are clearly erroneous, arbitrary, capricious, or contrary to law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 72, effective January 1, 1980.

45A.360.
Administrative regulations.

A local public agency may adopt regulations, not inconsistent with KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

, governing the following:

Conditions and procedures for delegations of purchasing authority;

Prequalification, suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders;

Modification and termination of contracts;

Conditions and procedures for the purchase of perishables and items for resale;

Conditions, including emergencies, and procedures under which purchases may be made by means other than competitive sealed bids;

Rejection of bids, consideration of alternate bids, and waiver of informalities in offers;

Confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets information submitted by actual and prospective bidders or offerors;

Partial, progressive, and multiple awards;

Supervision of store rooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the management, transfer, sale, or other disposal of government-owned property;

Definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;

Procedures for the verification and auditing of local public agency procurement records;

Annual reports from those vested with purchasing authority as may be deemed advisable in order to insure that the requirements of this chapter are complied with; and

Such other regulations as may be deemed advisable to carry out the purposes of KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

or otherwise fulfill the local public agency’s procurement responsibilities.

All local public agency ordinances and regulations pertaining to procurement, whether promulgated under KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

or otherwise, shall be maintained by the local public agency and shall be available to the public upon request at a cost not to exceed the cost of reproduction.

Local school districts may adopt policies, not inconsistent with KRS

45A.345

to

45A.460

, governing the conditions and procedures under which purchases of supplies may be made elsewhere. These policies shall include a provision that supplies purchased under this section shall meet any applicable contract specifications and not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 73, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 10, effective April 9, 1980; 1996, ch. 89, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A local public agency is not required to maintain a list of prequalified responsible prospective bidders.

OAG 80-21

.

If action is taken pursuant to subdivision (1)(k) of this section, it must be done by the local public agency pursuant to regulations enacted by that particular agency.

OAG 80-21

.

If a local board of education adopts the provisions of the Model Procurement Code applicable to the state and also adopts a regulation similar to that which has been promulgated by the Department of Finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) relating to noncompetitive negotiations, then items for resale such as caps and gowns and graduation invitations may be handled through noncompetitive negotiation.

OAG 80-108

.

A county hospital commission may adopt regulations and establish small purchase procedures pursuant to KRS

45A.385

, but, since the fiscal court cannot delegate its overall fiscal control of the county hospital, such regulations and procedures would be subject to fiscal court approval.

OAG 80-128

.

Since a county hospital commission is not an autonomous unit of government and is subject to the direct and overall fiscal and financial supervision of the fiscal court, proper regulations and small purchase procedures adopted by fiscal court for the general county operations could be made applicable to the county hospital, and in that way duplication of effort could be avoided and the county would be on a unified system.

OAG 80-128

.

45A.365.
Competitive sealed bidding.

All contracts or purchases shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding, which may include the use of a reverse auction, except as otherwise provided by KRS

45A.370

to

45A.385

and for the purchase of wholesale electric power by municipal utilities as provided in KRS 96.901(1).

The invitation for bids shall state that the award shall be made on the basis of the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated bid price. If the latter is used, the objective measurable criteria to be utilized shall be set forth in the invitation for bids. The invitation for bids shall include the reciprocal preference for resident bidders described in KRS

45A.494

.

Adequate public notice of the invitation for bids and any reverse auction shall be given prior to the date set forth for the opening of bids. The notice may include posting on the Internet or publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the local jurisdiction at least seven (7) days before the date set for the opening of the bids and any reverse auction. Nothing in this section shall prohibit additional notice, posting, or publication, nor shall additional notification, posting, or publication extend the required notice period. The public notice shall include the time and place the bids will be opened and the time and place where the specifications may be obtained.

The bids shall be opened publicly or entered through a reverse auction at the time and place designated in the invitation for bids. Each written or reverse auction bid, together with the name of the bidder, shall be recorded and be open to public inspection. Electronic bid opening and posting of the required information for public viewing shall satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

A contract shall be awarded with reasonable promptness by written notice to the responsive and responsible bidder whose bid is either the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated bid price after the application of any reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

.

The local public agency may allow the withdrawal of a bid where there is a patent error on the face of the bid document, or where the bidder presents sufficient evidence, substantiated by bid worksheets, that the bid was based upon an error in the formulation of the bid price.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 74, effective January 1, 1980; 1998, ch. 120, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 510, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 63, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, § 12, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 44, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

45A.370.
Competitive negotiation.

A local public agency may contract or purchase through competitive negotiation, which may include a reverse auction, upon a written finding that:

Specifications cannot be made sufficiently specific to permit award on the basis of either the lowest bid price or the lowest evaluated bid price, including, but not limited to, contracts for experimental or developmental research work, or highly complex equipment which requires technical discussions, and other nonstandard supplies, services, or construction; or

Sealed bidding is inappropriate because the available sources of supply are limited, the time and place of performance cannot be determined in advance, the price is regulated by law, or a fixed price contract is not applicable; or

The bid prices received through sealed bidding are unresponsive or unreasonable as to all or part of the requirements, or are identical or appear to have been the result of collusion; provided each responsible bidder is notified of the intention to negotiate and is given a reasonable opportunity to negotiate, and the negotiated price is lower than the lowest rejected bid by any responsible bidder.

Proposals shall be solicited through public notice pursuant to KRS 45A.365(3) or any other means which can be demonstrated to notify an adequate number of qualified sources to permit reasonable competition consistent with the nature and requirement of the procurement. The request for proposals shall indicate the factors to be considered in the evaluation, including the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

, and the relative importance of each factor, and the procedures to be followed if a reverse auction is used in the procurement.

Written or oral discussions shall be conducted with all responsible offerors who submit proposals determined in writing to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award. Discussions shall not disclose any information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors. Discussions need not be conducted:

With respect to prices, where such prices are fixed by law, regulation, or reverse auction, except that consideration shall be given to competitive terms and conditions; or

Where time of delivery or performance will not permit discussions; or

Where it can be clearly demonstrated and documented from the existence of adequate competition or accurate prior cost experience with that particular supply, service, or construction item that acceptance of an initial offer without discussion would result in fair and reasonable prices and the request for proposal notifies all offerors of the possibility that award may be made on the basis of initial offers.

If discussions pertaining to the revision of the specifications or quantities are held with any potential offeror, all other potential offerors shall be afforded an opportunity to take part in such discussions. A request for proposals based on revised specifications or quantities shall be issued as promptly as possible, shall provide for an expeditious response to the revised requirements and shall be awarded upon the basis of the lowest bid price or lowest evaluated bid price after application of the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

submitted by any responsive and responsible offeror. No discussion shall be conducted with offerors after submission of revised proposals except for a compelling reason as determined in writing by the local public agency. The request for proposals shall state that an award is to be made without discussion except as herein provided.

Award shall be made to the responsible offeror whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the local public agency based upon the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals and the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required by KRS

45A.494

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 75, effective January 1, 1980; 1998, ch. 120, § 14, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 63, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 162, § 13, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts chs. 63 and 162, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a small town water company cannot accurately predict the amount of chemicals it will need, has limited storage space to store chemicals that deteriorate somewhat in storage and that are somewhat unstable in nature, and has a history of purchasing chemicals in small quantities, indicating that such a practice was not just recently instituted to avoid the requirements of the Model Procurement Code, each purchase of these types of chemicals is a legally and factually separate transaction which, if under $2,500, is not subject to the bidding requirements of the Model Procurement Code and may be handled as a small purchase if small purchase procedures have been adopted pursuant to KRS

45A.385

.

OAG 80-125

.

A local public agency that has not adopted the Model Procurement Code is not required to follow competitive bidding procedures for insurance, and may contract with an insurance broker to solicit and receive bids for insurance, although competitive bidding remains preferred. A local public agency that has adopted the Model Procurement Code must follow all applicable provisions in seeking contracts with insurance brokers.

OAG 13-006

.

45A.375.
Negotiations after competitive sealed bidding when all bids exceed available funds — Action when no bids received.

In the event that all bids submitted pursuant to competitive sealed bidding under KRS

45A.365

result in bid prices in excess of the funds available for the purchase, and the local public agency determines in writing:

That there are no additional funds then available from any source so as to permit an award to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder; and

The best interest of the local public agency will not permit the delay attendant to a resolicitation under revised specifications or revised quantities under competitive sealed bidding as provided in KRS

45A.365

; then a negotiated award may be made as set forth in subsections (2) or (3) of this section.

Where there is more than one (1) bidder, competitive negotiations pursuant to KRS

45A.370

shall be conducted with the three (3) (two (2) if there are only two (2)) bidders determined in writing by the local public agency to be the lowest responsive and responsible bidders to the competitive sealed bid invitation after application of the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required in KRS

45A.494

. Such competitive negotiations shall be conducted under the following restrictions:

If discussions pertaining to the revision of the specifications or quantities are held with any potential offeror, all other potential offerors shall be afforded an opportunity to take part in such discussions; and

A request for proposals, based upon revised specifications or quantities, shall be issued as promptly as possible, shall provide for an expeditious response to the revised requirements, and shall be awarded upon the basis of the lowest bid price or lowest evaluated bid price submitted by any responsive and responsible offeror after application of the reciprocal preference for resident bidders required in KRS

45A.494

. No discussion shall be conducted with offerors after submission of proposals except for a compelling reason as determined in writing by the local public agency. The request for proposals shall state that award is to be made without discussions except as herein provided.

Where, after competitive sealed bidding, it is determined in writing that there is only one (1) responsive and responsible bidder, a noncompetitive negotiated award may be made with such bidder in accordance with KRS

45A.380

.

Where, after invitation for bids has been made in accordance with KRS

45A.365

and no bids have been received from responsive and responsible bidders, the local public agency may proceed to acquire the supplies, services, or construction by noncompetitive negotiations in accordance with KRS

45A.380

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 110, § 76, effective January 1, 1980; 1980, ch. 250, § 11, effective April 9, 1980; 2010, ch. 162, § 14, effective July 15, 2010.